Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4454.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 12. (1) When If a public employee or group of public employees, or an individual or labor organization acting on their behalf, files a petition with the commission in accordance with the rules promulgated by the commission that alleges that more than 50% of the public employees within a unit claimed to be appropriate for the purpose of collective bargaining wish to be represented for collective bargaining, the commission shall investigate the petition. If, after the commission completes the investigation, the commission has reasonable cause to believe that a question of representation exists, the commission shall provide an appropriate hearing after due notice. If, based on the record of a hearing conducted under this subsection, the commission determines that more than 50% of the public employees within a unit appropriate for the purpose of collective bargaining wish to be represented for collective bargaining, the commission shall certify the representative as the exclusive bargaining representative as described in section 11. (2) If the commission receives a petition is filed , by either of the following in accordance with the rules promulgated by the commission, the commission shall investigate the petition and, if the commission has reasonable cause to believe that a question of representation exists, provide an appropriate hearing after due notice: (a) By a A public employee or group of public employees, or an individual or labor organization acting in on their behalf, alleging that 30% or more of the public employees within a unit claimed to be appropriate for such the purpose of collective bargaining wish to be represented for collective bargaining and that their public employer declines to recognize their representative as the representative defined described in section 11, or assert asserting that the individual or labor organization, which is certified or is being currently recognized by their public employer as the bargaining representative, is no longer a representative as defined described in section 11. ; or (b) By a A public employer or his the public employer's representative alleging that 1 or more individuals or labor organizations have presented to him the public employer a claim to be recognized as the representative defined described in section 11. ; (3) The commission shall investigate the petition and, if it has reasonable cause to believe that a question of representation exists, shall provide an appropriate hearing after due notice. If, the commission finds upon based on the record of the a hearing conducted under subsection (2), the commission determines that such a question of representation exists, it the commission shall direct an election by secret ballot and shall certify the results thereof. Nothing in this of the election. This section shall be construed to does not prohibit the waiving of hearings by stipulation for the purpose of a consent election in conformity accordance with the rules of promulgated by the commission. Sec. 14. An election must not be directed in any bargaining unit or any subdivision within which, in the preceding 12-month period, a valid election was held or a bargaining representative was certified under section 12(1). The commission shall determine who is eligible to vote in the election and shall promulgate rules governing the election. In an election involving more than 2 choices, if none of the choices on the ballot receives a majority vote, a runoff election must be conducted between the 2 choices receiving the 2 largest numbers of valid votes cast in the election. An election must not be directed in any bargaining unit or subdivision of any bargaining unit if there is in force and effect a valid collective bargaining agreement that was not prematurely extended and that is of fixed duration. A However, the existence of a valid collective bargaining agreement that was not prematurely extended and that is of fixed duration does not bar an election upon the petition of persons not parties to the collective bargaining agreement if more than 3 years have elapsed since the agreement's execution or last timely renewal, whichever was later.